Illinois, session 104th, HB250.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by adding 5Section 25-5-140 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 30/25-5-140 new)7    Sec. 25-5-140. Quick-take; Will County; 143rd Street. 8    (a) Quick-take proceedings under Article 20 may be used 9for a period of 2 years after the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly by Will County 11for the acquisition of the following described property for 12the purpose of road construction:13Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)14Section: 08-00169-18-LA15County: Will16Job No.:17Parcel: 004318Station: 215+39.04 to 242+04.1419Index No.: 16-05-03-400-001-000020That part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 3, Township 36 21North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in Will 22County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 23State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011   HB0250 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 2as follows:3Beginning at the southwest corner of said Southeast Quarter; 4thence North 01 degrees 52 minutes 52 seconds West along the 5west line of said Southeast Quarter a distance of 50.00 feet; 6thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance 7of 285.01 feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 8West a distance of 30.00 feet; thence North 88 degrees 01 9minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 62.00 feet; thence South 1001 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 30.00 feet; 11thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance 12of 1441.01 feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 13West a distance of 30.00 feet; thence North 88 degrees 01 14minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 84.00 feet; thence South 1501 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 30.00 feet; 16thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance 17of 688.01 feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 18West a distance of 10.00 feet; thence North 88 degrees 01 19minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 52.00 feet; thence North 2043 degrees 03 minutes 14 seconds East a distance of 28.30 feet, 21to a line 33.00 feet west of and parallel with the east line of 22said Southeast Quarter; thence North 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 23seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 669.74 24feet; thence North 88 degrees 05 minutes 11 seconds East a 25distance of 33.00 feet to said east line of the Southeast 26Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East   HB0250 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1along said east line a distance of 739.70 feet, to the south 2line of said Southeast Quarter; thence South 87 degrees 48 3minutes 24 seconds West along said south line a distance of 42665.08 feet, to the point of beginning.56Said parcel containing 3.405 acres, more or less or 148,317 7square feet, more or less, of which 2.753 acres, more or less 8or 119,926 square feet, more or less, was previously dedicated 9or used for highway purposes. 10Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)11Section: 08-00169-18-LA12County: Will13Job No.:14Parcel: 0043TE-A15Station: 215+39.08 to 216+67.0816Index No.: 16-05-03-400-001-000017That part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 3, Township 36 18North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in Will 19County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 20State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 21adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 22as follows:23Commencing at the southwest corner of said Southeast Quarter; 24thence North 01 degrees 52 minutes 52 seconds West along the 25west line of said Southeast Quarter a distance of 50.00 feet,   HB0250 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1to the Point of Beginning; thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 218 seconds East a distance of 128.00 feet; thence North 01 3degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds West a distance of 5.00 feet; 4thence South 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds West a distance 5of 74.00 feet; thence North 01 degree 58 minutes 42 seconds 6West a distance of 20.00 feet; thence South 88 degrees 01 7minutes 18 seconds West a distance of 40.00 feet; thence South 801 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 5.00 feet; 9thence South 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds West a distance 10of 13.97 feet, to said west line of the Southeast Quarter; 11thence South 01 degrees 52 minutes 52 seconds East along said 12west line a distance of 20.00 feet, to the point of beginning.13Said parcel containing 0.038 acres, more or less or 1,650 14square feet, more or less. 15Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)16Section: 08-00169-18-LA17County: Will18Job No.:19Parcel: 0043TE-B20Station: 217+75.09 to 218+24.0921Index No.: 16-05-03-400-001-000022That part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 3, Township 36 23North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in Will 24County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 25State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011   HB0250 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 2as follows:3Commencing at the southwest corner of said Southeast Quarter; 4thence North 01 degrees 52 minutes 52 seconds West along the 5west line of said Southeast Quarter a distance of 50.00 feet; 6thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance 7of 236.01 feet, to the Point of Beginning; thence continuing 8North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 49.00 9feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds West a 10distance of 5.00 feet; thence South 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 11seconds West a distance of 49.00 feet; thence South 01 degrees 1258 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 5.00 feet, to the 13Point of Beginning.14Said parcel containing 0.006 acres, more or less or 245 square 15feet, more or less. 16Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)17Section: 08-00169-18-LA18County: Will19Job No.:20Parcel: 0043TE-C21Station: 218+86.09 to 221+50.0922Index No.: 16-05-03-400-001-000023That part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 3, Township 36 24North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in Will 25County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois   HB0250 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 2adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 3as follows:4Commencing at the southwest corner of said Southeast Quarter; 5thence North 01 degrees 52 minutes 52 seconds West along the 6west line of said Southeast Quarter a distance of 50.00 feet; 7thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance 8of 285.01 feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 9West a distance of 30.00 feet; thence North 88 degrees 01 10minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 62.00 feet; thence South 1101 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 25.00 feet, 12to the Point of Beginning; thence continuing South 01 degrees 1358 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 5.00 feet; thence 14North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 15264.00 feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 16West a distance of 5.00 feet; thence South 88 degrees 01 17minutes 18 seconds West a distance of 264.00 feet, to the Point 18of Beginning.19Said parcel containing 0.030 acres, more or less or 1,320 20square feet, more or less. 21Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)22Section: 08-00169-18-LA23County: Will24Job No.:25Parcel: 0043TE-D  HB0250 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Station: 222+90.09 to 233+27.102Index No.: 16-05-03-400-001-00003That part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 3, Township 36 4North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in Will 5County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 6State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 7adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 8as follows:9Commencing at the southwest corner of said Southeast Quarter; 10thence North 01 degrees 52 minutes 52 seconds West along the 11west line of said Southeast Quarter a distance of 50.00 feet; 12thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance 13of 285.01 feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 14West a distance of 30.00 feet; thence North 88 degrees 01 15minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 62.00 feet; thence South 1601 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 30.00 feet; 17thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance 18of 404.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning; thence continuing 19North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 201037.01 feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 21West a distance of 10.00 feet; thence South 88 degrees 01 22minutes 18 seconds West 640.00 feet; thence South 01 degrees 2358 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 5.00 feet; thence 24South 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds West a distance of 25397.01 feet; thence South 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 26East a distance of 5.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.  HB0250 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b12Said parcel containing 0.192 acres, more or less or 8,385 3square feet, more or less. 4Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)5Section: 08-00169-18-LA6County: Will7Job No.:8Parcel: 0043TE-F9Station: 234+11.07 to 238+04.9510Index No.: 16-05-03-400-001-000011That part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 3, Township 36 12North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in Will 13County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 14State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 15adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 16as follows:17Commencing at the southwest corner of said Southeast Quarter; 18thence North 01 degrees 52 minutes 52 seconds West along the 19west line of said Southeast Quarter a distance of 50.00 feet; 20thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance 21of 285.01 feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 22West a distance of 30.00 feet; thence North 88 degrees 01 23minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 62.00 feet; thence South 2401 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 30.00 feet; 25thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance   HB0250 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1of 1441.01 feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds 2West a distance of 30.00 feet; thence North 88 degrees 01 3minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 84.00 feet; thence South 401 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 20.00 feet, 5to the Point of Beginning; thence continue South 01 degrees 58 6minutes 42 seconds East a distance of 10.00 feet; thence North 788 degrees 01 minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 393.86 8feet; thence North 01 degrees 58 minutes 42 seconds West a 9distance of 10.00 feet; thence South 88 degrees 01 minutes 18 10seconds West a distance of 393.86 feet, to the Point of 11Beginning. Said parcel containing 0.090 acres, more or less or 123,939 square feet, more or less. 13Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)14Section: 08-00169-18-LA15County: Will16Job No.:17Parcel: 004418Station: 242+54.19 to 242+96.1619Index No.: 16-05-02-301-011-000020That part of Lot 11 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Hills, a 21subdivision of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 22North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 23according to the plat thereof recorded March 8, 1963, as 24Document No. 978860, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and   HB0250 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 2East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 30.999956901, described as follows:4Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 11; thence North 501 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along the west line of 6said Lot 11 a distance of 35.11 feet; thence South 46 degrees 756 minutes 51 seconds East a distance of 35.33 feet; thence 8North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East a distance of 17.00 9feet; thence South 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East a 10distance of 10.11 feet, to the south line of said Lot 11; 11thence South 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds West along said 12south line a distance of 42.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.13Said parcel containing 0.017 acres, more or less or 737 square 14feet, more or less. 15Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)16Section: 08-00169-18-LA17County: Will18Job No.:19Parcel: 0044TE20Station: 242+54.19 to 242+64.2121Index No.: 16-05-02-301-011-000022That part of Lot 11 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Hills, a 23subdivision of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 24North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 25according to the plat thereof recorded March 8, 1963, as   HB0250 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Document No. 978860, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 2distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 3East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 40.999956901, described as follows:5Commencing at the southwest corner of said Lot 11; thence 6North 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along the west line 7of said Lot 11 a distance of 35.11 feet, to the Point of 8Beginning; thence South 46 degrees 56 minutes 51 seconds East 9a distance of 14.13 feet, to a line 10.00 feet east of and 10parallel with said west line of Lot 11; thence North 01 degrees 1154 minutes 49 seconds West along said parallel line a distance 12of 30.00 feet; thence South 88 degrees 05 minutes 11 seconds 13West a distance of 10.00 feet, to said west line of Lot 11; 14thence South 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East along said 15west line a distance of 20.01 feet, to the Point of Beginning.16Said parcel containing 0.006 acres, more or less or 250 square 17feet, more or less. 18Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)19Section: 08-00169-18-LA20County: Will21Job No.:22Parcel: 0045TE23Station: 244+56.15 to 246+58.1724Index No.: 16-05-02-301-012-000025That part of Lot 12 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Hills, a   HB0250 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1subdivision in the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 2North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 3according to the plat thereof recorded March 8, 1963, as 4Document No. 978860, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 5distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 6East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 70.999956901, described as follows:8Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 12; thence North 901 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along the west line of 10said Lot 12 a distance of 5.08 feet; thence North 88 degrees 01 11minutes 07 seconds East a distance of 187.00 feet; thence 12North 43 degrees 03 minutes 09 seconds East a distance of 21.23 13feet, to the east line of said Lot 12; thence South 01 degrees 1454 minutes 49 seconds East along said east line a distance of 1520.04 feet, to the south line of said Lot 12; thence South 88 16degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds West along said south line a 17distance of 202.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.18Said parcel containing 0.026 acres, more or less or 1,134 19square feet, more or less. 20Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)21Section: 08-00169-18-LA22County: Will23Job No.:24Parcel: 0056TE-A25Station: 602+54.29 to 602+60.29  HB0250 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Index No.: 16-05-02-301-010-00002That part of Lot 10 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Hills, a 3subdivision of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 4North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 5according to the plat thereof recorded March 8, 1963 as 6Document Number 978860, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 7distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 8East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 90.999956901, described as follows:10Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 10; thence South 1101 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East along the west line of 12said Lot 10 a distance of 6.00 feet, to a line 6.00 feet south 13of and parallel with the north line of said Lot 10; thence 14North 88 degrees 05 minutes 07 seconds East along said 15parallel line a distance of 12.00 feet, to a line 12.00 feet 16east of and parallel with said west line of Lot 10; thence 17North 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along said 18parallel line a distance of 6.00 feet, to said north line of 19Lot 10; thence South 88 degrees 05 minutes 07 seconds West 20along said north line a distance of 12.00 feet, to the Point of 21Beginning.22Said parcel containing 0.002 acres, more or less or 72 square 23feet, more or less. 24Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)25Section: 08-00169-18-LA  HB0250 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1County: Will2Job No.:3Parcel: 0056TE-B4Station: 601+78.79 to 602+13.795Index No.: 16-05-02-301-010-00006That part of Lot 10 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Hills, a 7subdivision of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 8North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 9according to the plat thereof recorded March 8, 1963 as 10Document Number 978860, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 11distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 12East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 130.999956901, described as follows:14Commencing at the northwest corner of said Lot 10; thence 15South 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East along the west line 16of said Lot 10 a distance of 46.50 feet, to the Point of 17Beginning; thence continuing South 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 18seconds East along said west line a distance of 35.00 feet, to 19a line 81.50 feet south of and parallel with said north line of 20Lot 10; thence North 88 degrees 05 minutes 07 seconds East 21along said parallel line a distance of 12.00 feet, to a line 2212.00 feet east of and parallel with said west line of Lot 10; 23thence North 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along said 24parallel line a distance of 35.00 feet, to a line 46.50 feet 25south of and parallel with the north line of said Lot 10; 26thence South 88 degrees 05 minutes 07 seconds West along said   HB0250 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1parallel line a distance of 12.00 feet, to the Point of 2Beginning.3Said parcel containing 0.010 acres, more or less or 420 square 4feet, more or less. 5Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)6Section: 08-00169-18-LA7County: Will8Job No.:9Parcel: 0057TE10Station: 602+60.29 to 602+89.2911Index No.: 16-05-02-301-009-000012That part of Lot 9 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Hills, a 13subdivision in the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 14North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 15according to the plat thereof recorded March 8, 1963, as 16Document No. 978860, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 17distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 18East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 190.999956901, described as follows:20Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 9; thence North 2101 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along the west line of 22said Lot 9 a distance of 29.00 feet, to a line 29.00 feet north 23of and parallel with the south line of said Lot 9; thence North 2488 degrees 05 minutes 07 seconds East along said parallel line 25a distance of 12.00 feet, to a line 12.00 feet east of and   HB0250 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1parallel with said west line of Lot 9; thence South 01 degrees 254 minutes 49 seconds East along said parallel line a distance 3of 29.00 feet, to said south line of Lot 9; thence South 88 4degrees 05 minutes 07 seconds West along said south line a 5distance of 12.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.6Said parcel containing 0.008 acres, more or less or 348 square 7feet, more or less. 8Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)9Section: 08-00169-18-LA10County: Will11Job No.:12Parcel: 0058TE13Station: 604+06.79 to 604+41.7914Index No.: 16-05-02-301-008-000015That part of Lot 8 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Hills, a 16subdivision in the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 17North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 18according to the plat thereof recorded March 8, 1963, as 19Document No. 978860, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 20distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 21East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 220.999956901, described as follows:23Commencing at the northwest corner of said Lot 8; thence South 2401 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East along the west line of 25said Lot 8 a distance of 18.50 feet, to the Point of Beginning;   HB0250 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1thence continuing South 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East 2along said west line a distance of 35.00 feet, to a line 53.50 3feet south of and parallel with the north line of said Lot 8; 4thence North 88 degrees 05 minutes 07 seconds East along said 5parallel line a distance of 12.00 feet, to a line 12.00 feet 6east of and parallel with said west line of Lot 8; thence North 701 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along said parallel line 8a distance of 35.00 feet, to a line 18.50 feet south of and 9parallel with said north line of Lot 8; thence South 88 degrees 1005 minutes 07 seconds West along said parallel line a distance 11of 12.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.12Said parcel containing 0.010 acres, more or less or 420 square 13feet, more or less. 14Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)15Section: 08-00169-18-LA16County: Will17Job No.:18Parcel: 0059TE19Station: 605+17.79 to 605+52.7920Index No.: 16-05-02-301-007-000021That part of Lot 7 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Hills, a 22subdivision in the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 23North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 24according to the plat thereof recorded March 8, 1963, as 25Document No. 978860, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and   HB0250 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 2East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 30.999956901, described as follows:4Commencing at the northwest corner of said Lot 7; thence South 501 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East along the west line of 6said Lot 7 a distance of 7.50 feet, to the Point of Beginning; 7thence continuing South 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East 8along said west line a distance of 35.00 feet, to a line 42.50 9feet south of and parallel with the north line of said Lot 7; 10thence North 88 degrees 05 minutes 07 seconds East along said 11parallel line a distance of 12.00 feet, to a line 12.00 feet 12east of and parallel with said west line of Lot 7; thence North 1301 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along said parallel line 14a distance of 35.00 feet, to a line 7.50 feet south of and 15parallel with said north line of Lot 7; thence South 88 degrees 1605 minutes 07 seconds West along said parallel line a distance 17of 12.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.18Said parcel containing 0.010 acres, more or less or 420 square 19feet, more or less. 20Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)21Section: 08-00169-18-LA22County: Will23Job No.:24Parcel: 0046TE25Station: 247+24.15 to 249+34.93  HB0250 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Index No.: 16-05-02-302-009-00002That part of Lot 32 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Hills, a 3subdivision of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 4North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 5according to the plat thereof recorded March 8, 1963, as 6Document No. 978860, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 7distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 8East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 90.999956901, described as follows:10Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 32; thence North 1101 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along the west line of 12said Lot 32 a distance of 37.67 feet; thence North 88 degrees 1300 minutes 31 seconds East a distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 1410.00 feet east of and parallel with said west line of Lot 32; 15thence South 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East along said 16parallel line a distance of 27.67 feet; thence North 88 17degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East a distance of 10.00 feet, to 18a line 20.00 feet east of and parallel with said west line of 19Lot 32; thence South 01 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds East 20along said parallel line a distance of 5.00 feet; thence North 2188 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East a distance of 190.78 22feet, to the east line of said Lot 32; thence South 01 degrees 2354 minutes 49 seconds East along said east line a distance of 245.00 feet, to the south line of said Lot 32; thence South 88 25degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds West along said south line a 26distance of 210.78 feet, to the Point of Beginning.  HB0250 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Said parcel containing 0.033 acres, more or less or 1,432 2square feet, more or less. 3Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)4Section: 08-00169-18-LA5County: Will6Job No.:7Parcel: 00478Station: 249+34.93 to 251+20.999Index No.: 16-05-02-302-014-000010That part of Lot 16 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Woods, a 11subdivision of the East 915.0 feet of the South 1150.0 feet of 12the West 100 Acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, 13Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal 14Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded September 5, 151962, as Document No. 964959, in Will County, Illinois, 16bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 17Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a 18combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:19Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 16; thence North 2001 degrees 54 minutes 49 seconds West along the west line of 21said Lot 16 a distance of 5.00 feet, to a line 5.00 feet north 22of and parallel with the south line of said Lot 16; thence 23North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East along said 24parallel line a distance of 170.51 feet; thence North 40 25degrees 16 minutes 21 seconds East a distance of 20.27 feet, to   HB0250 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1the easterly line of said Lot 16; thence South 07 degrees 27 2minutes 49 seconds East along said easterly line a distance of 320.09 feet, to said south line of Lot 16; thence South 88 4degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds West along said south line a 5distance of 186.06 feet, to the Point of Beginning.6Said parcel containing 0.024 acres, more or less or 1,042 7square feet, more or less. 8Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)9Section: 08-00169-18-LA10County: Will11Job No.:12Parcel: 004813Station: 251+85.37 to 254+13.4814Index No.: 16-05-02-303-006-000015That part of Lot 17 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Woods, a 16subdivision of the East 915 feet of the South 1150 feet of the 17West 100 Acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 1836 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 19according to the plat thereof recorded September 5, 1962, as 20Document No. 964959, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 21distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 22East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 230.999956901, described as follows:24Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 17; thence North 2507 degrees 27 minutes 49 seconds West along the westerly line   HB0250 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1of said Lot 17 a distance of 20.09 feet; thence South 49 2degrees 43 minutes 39 seconds East a distance of 22.30 feet, to 3a line 5.00 feet north of and parallel with the south line of 4said Lot 17; thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East 5along said parallel line a distance of 157.93 feet; thence 6North 01 degrees 59 minutes 29 seconds West a distance of 15.00 7feet, to a line 20.00 feet north of and parallel with said 8south line of Lot 17; thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 9seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 53.67 10feet, to the easterly line of said Lot 17; thence South 18 11degrees 25 minutes 19 seconds West along said easterly line a 12distance of 21.34 feet, to said south line of Lot 17; thence 13South 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds West along said south 14line a distance of 218.75 feet, to the Point of Beginning.15Said parcel containing 0.045 acres, more or less or 1,976 16square feet, more or less. 17Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)18Section: 08-00169-18-LA19County: Will20Job No.:21Parcel: 0048TE-A22Station: 251+96.33 to 253+59.8123Index No.: 16-05-02-303-006-000024That part of Lot 17 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Woods, a 25subdivision of the East 915 feet of the South 1150 feet of the   HB0250 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1West 100 Acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 236 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 3according to the plat thereof recorded September 5, 1962, as 4Document No. 964959, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 5distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 6East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 70.999956901, described as follows:8Commencing at the southwest corner of said Lot 17; thence 9North 07 degrees 27 minutes 49 seconds West along the westerly 10line of said Lot 17 a distance of 20.09 feet; thence South 49 11degrees 43 minutes 39 seconds East a distance of 14.87 feet, to 12the Point of Beginning; thence continuing South 49 degrees 43 13minutes 39 seconds East a distance of 7.43 feet, to a line 5.00 14feet north of and parallel with the south line of said Lot 17; 15thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East along said 16parallel line a distance of 157.93 feet; thence North 01 17degrees 59 minutes 29 seconds West a distance of 5.00 feet, to 18a line 10.00 feet north of and parallel with said south line of 19Lot 17; thence South 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds West 20along said parallel line a distance of 163.43 feet, to the 21Point of Beginning.22Said parcel containing 0.018 acres, more or less or 803 square 23feet, more or less. 24Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)25Section: 08-00169-18-LA  HB0250 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1County: Will2Job No.:3Parcel: 0048TE-B4Station: 253+68.81 to 254+32.165Index No.: 16-05-02-303-006-00006That part of Lot 17 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Woods, a 7subdivision of the East 915 feet of the South 1150 feet of the 8West 100 Acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 936 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 10according to the plat thereof recorded September 5, 1962, as 11Document No. 964959, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 12distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 13East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 140.999956901, described as follows:15Commencing at the southwest corner of said Lot 17; thence 16North 07 degrees 27 minutes 49 seconds West along the westerly 17line of said Lot 17 a distance of 20.09 feet; thence South 49 18degrees 43 minutes 39 seconds East a distance of 22.30 feet, to 19a line 5.00 feet north of and parallel with the south line of 20said Lot 17; thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East 21along said parallel line a distance of 157.93 feet; thence 22North 01 degrees 59 minutes 29 seconds West a distance of 15.00 23feet, to a line 20.00 feet north of and parallel with said 24south line of Lot 17; thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 25seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 9.00 feet, 26to the Point of Beginning; thence continuing North 88 degrees   HB0250 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b100 minutes 31 seconds East along said parallel line a distance 2of 44.67 feet, to the easterly line of said Lot 17; thence 3North 18 degrees 25 minutes 19 seconds East along said 4easterly line a distance of 53.60 feet; thence North 71 5degrees 34 minutes 41 seconds West a distance of 33.74 feet; 6thence South 25 degrees 07 minutes 21 seconds West a distance 7of 69.65 feet, to the Point of Beginning.8Said parcel containing 0.053 acres, more or less or 2,289 9square feet, more or less. 10Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)11Section: 08-00169-18-LA12County: Will13Job No.:14Parcel: 004915Station: 254+06.04 to 255+68.0616Index No.: 16-05-02-303-011-000017That part of Lot 27 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Woods, a 18subdivision of the East 915 feet of the South 1150 feet of the 19West 100 Acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 2036 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 21according to the plat thereof recorded September 5, 1962, as 22Document No. 964959, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 23distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 24East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 250.999956901, described as follows:  HB0250 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 27; thence North 218 degrees 25 minutes 19 seconds East along the westerly line 3of said Lot 27 a distance of 21.34 feet, to a line 20.00 feet 4north of and parallel with the south line of said Lot 27; 5thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East along said 6parallel line a distance of 26.33 feet; thence South 01 7degrees 59 minutes 29 seconds East a distance of 10.00 feet, to 8a line 10.00 feet north of and parallel with said south line of 9Lot 27; thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East 10along said parallel line a distance of 116.80 feet; thence 11North 39 degrees 11 minutes 54 seconds East a distance of 13.29 12feet, to the easterly line of said Lot 27; thence South 9 13degrees 36 minutes 42 seconds East along said easterly line a 14distance of 20.18 feet, to said south line of Lot 27; thence 15South 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds West along said south 16line a distance of 162.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.17Said parcel containing 0.044 acres, more or less or 1,927 18square feet, more or less. 19Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)20Section: 08-00169-18-LA21County: Will22Job No.:23Parcel: 0049TE24Station: 254+13.48 to 254+60.7225Index No.: 16-05-02-303-011-0000  HB0250 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1That part of Lot 27 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Woods, a 2subdivision of the East 915 feet of the South 1150 feet of the 3West 100 Acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 436 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 5according to the plat thereof recorded September 5, 1962, as 6Document No. 964959, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 7distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 8East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 90.999956901, described as follows:10Commencing at the southwest corner of said Lot 27; thence 11North 18 degrees 25 minutes 19 seconds East along the westerly 12line of said Lot 27 a distance of 21.34 feet, to a line 20.00 13feet north of and parallel with the south line of said Lot 27 14and the Point of Beginning; thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 1531 seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 26.33 16feet; thence North 25 degrees 51 minutes 00 seconds East a 17distance of 44.79 feet; thence North 71 degrees 34 minutes 41 18seconds West a distance of 30.47 feet, to the said westerly 19line of Lot 27; thence South 18 degrees 25 minutes 19 seconds 20West along said westerly line a distance of 53.60 feet, to the 21Point of Beginning.22Said parcel containing 0.031 acres, more or less or 1,338 23square feet, more or less. 24Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)25Section: 08-00169-18-LA  HB0250 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1County: Will2Job No.:3Parcel: 00504Station: 256+33.29 to 258+49.935Index No.: 16-05-02-304-034-00006That part of Lot 1 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Woods, a 7subdivision of the East 915.0 feet of the South 1150.0 feet of 8the West 100 Acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, 9Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal 10Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded September 5, 111962, as Document No. 964959, in Will County, Illinois, 12bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 13Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a 14combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:15Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 1; thence North 1609 degrees 36 minutes 42 seconds West along the westerly line 17of said Lot 1 a distance of 10.09 feet, to a line 10.00 feet 18north of and parallel with the south line of said Lot 1; thence 19North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East along said 20parallel line a distance of 36.64 feet; thence North 01 21degrees 57 minutes 08 seconds West a distance of 5.00 feet, to 22a line 15.00 feet north of and parallel with said south line of 23Lot 1; thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East along 24said parallel line a distance of 80.00 feet; thence South 01 25degrees 57 minutes 08 seconds East a distance of 10.00 feet, to 26a line 5.00 feet north of and parallel with said south line of   HB0250 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Lot 1; thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East along 2said parallel line a distance of 100.00 feet, to the east line 3of said Lot 1; thence South 01 degrees 57 minutes 08 seconds 4East along said east line a distance of 5.00 feet, to said 5south line of Lot 1; thence South 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 6seconds West along said south line a distance of 215.30 feet, 7to the Point of Beginning.8Said parcel containing 0.047 acres, more or less or 2,060 9square feet, more or less. 10Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)11Section: 08-00169-18-LA12County: Will13Job No.:14Parcel: 0050TE15Station: 257+49.93 to 258+49.9316Index No.: 16-05-02-304-034-000017That part of Lot 1 in Brashler and Kall's Chickasaw Woods, a 18subdivision of the East 915.0 feet of the South 1150.0 feet of 19the West 100 Acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, 20Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal 21Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded September 5, 221962, as Document No. 964959, in Will County, Illinois, 23bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 24Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a 25combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:  HB0250 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Commencing at the southwest corner of said Lot 1; thence North 209 degrees 36 minutes 42 seconds West along the westerly line 3of said Lot 1 a distance of 10.09 feet, to a line 10.00 feet 4north of and parallel with the south line of said Lot 1; thence 5North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East along said 6parallel line a distance of 36.64 feet; thence North 01 7degrees 57 minutes 08 seconds West a distance of 5.00 feet, to 8a line 15.00 feet north of and parallel with said south line of 9Lot 1; thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East along 10said parallel line a distance of 80.00 feet; thence South 01 11degrees 57 minutes 08 seconds East a distance of 8.00 feet, to 12the Point of Beginning; thence continuing South 01 degrees 57 13minutes 08 seconds East a distance of 2.00 feet, to a line 5.00 14feet north of and parallel with said south line of Lot 1; 15thence North 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East along said 16parallel line a distance of 100.00 feet, to the east line of 17said Lot 1; thence North 01 degrees 57 minutes 08 seconds West 18along said east line a distance of 2.00 feet, to a line 7.00 19north of and parallel with said south line of Lot 1; thence 20South 88 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds West along said 21parallel line a distance of 100.00 feet, to the Point of 22Beginning.23Said parcel containing 0.005 acres, more or less or 200 square 24feet, more or less. 25Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)  HB0250 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Section: 08-00169-18-LA2County: Will3Job No.:4Parcel: 00515Station: 258+49.91 to 268+47.796Index No.: 16-05-02-300-007(pt)7That part of the Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 8North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in Will 9County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 10State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 11adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 12as follows:13Beginning at the intersection of the south line of said 14Southwest Quarter with the east line of Brashler & Kall's 15Chickasaw Woods, a subdivision in said Southwest Quarter of 16Section 2, according to the plat thereof recorded September 5, 171962 as Document No. 964959; thence North 01 degrees 57 18minutes 08 seconds West along said east line a distance of 1942.74 feet, to a line 20.00 feet south of and parallel with the 20north line of 143rd Street as dedicated in the Final Plat of 21Villas of Old Oak, a Planned Unit Development, recorded 22December 7, 2022 as Document No. R2022-085644, in said 23Southwest Quarter of Section 2, also being the north line of 24dedication for public road purposes per Document No. 457941; 25thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East along said 26parallel line also being the north line of said dedication for   HB0250 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1public road purposes per Document No. 457941 a distance of 2931.97 feet; to the west line of Golden Oak Drive as dedicated 3per Document No. R77-042665; thence North 88 degrees 01 4minutes 07 seconds East along the south line of said Golden Oak 5Drive a distance of 66.00 feet, to the east line of said 6Southwest Quarter of Section 2; thence South 01 degrees 35 7minutes 29 seconds East along said east line a distance of 844.58 feet, to said south line of the Southwest Quarter of 9Section 2; thence South 88 degrees 07 minutes 28 seconds West 10along said south line a distance of 997.69 feet, to the Point 11of Beginning.12Said parcel containing 1.000 acres, more or less or 43,563 13square feet, more or less, of which 1.000 acres, more or less 14or 43,563 square feet, more or less, was previously dedicated 15or used for highway purposes. 16Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)17Section: 08-00169-18-LA18County: Will19Job No.:20Parcel: 0051TE21Station: 267+54.94 to 267+82.1722Index No.: 16-05-02-310-042-000023That part of Outlot D in the Final Plat of Villas of Old Oak, a 24Planned Unit Development, recorded December 7, 2022, as 25Document No. R2022-085644, being a subdivision of the   HB0250 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 North, Range 11 2East of the Third Principal Meridian, except the north 1765.01 3feet thereof and except the east 66.00 feet thereof, in Will 4County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 5State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 6adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 7as follows:8Beginning at the southmost southeast corner of said Outlot D; 9thence South 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds West along the 10south line of said Outlot D a distance of 7.09 feet, to a line 115.00 feet northwesterly of and parallel with the southeasterly 12line of said Outlot D; thence North 43 degrees 11 minutes 09 13seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 24.26 14feet, to a line 10.00 feet west of and parallel with the east 15line of said Outlot D; thence North 01 degrees 35 minutes 21 16seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 148.58 17feet, to the north line of said Outlot D; thence North 88 18degrees 08 minutes 36 seconds East along said north line a 19distance of 10.00 feet, to the east line of said Outlot D; 20thence South 01 degrees 35 minutes 21 seconds East along said 21east line a distance of 145.65 feet, to said southeasterly 22line of Outlot D; thence South 43 degrees 11 minutes 09 seconds 23West along said southeasterly line a distance of 28.39 feet, 24to the Point of Beginning.25Said parcel containing 0.037 acres, more or less or 1,603 26square feet, more or less.   HB0250 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)2Section: 08-00169-18-LA3County: Will4Job No.:5Parcel: 0061TE6Station: 502+35.40 to 502+55.457Index No.: 16-05-02-310-041-00008That part of Lot 13 in the Final Plat of Villas of Old Oak, a 9Planned Unit Development, recorded December 7, 2022, as 10Document No. R2022-085644, being a subdivision of the 11Southwest Quarter of Section 2, Township 36 North, Range 11 12East of the Third Principal Meridian, except the north 1765.01 13feet thereof and except the east 66.00 feet thereof, in Will 14County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 15State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 16adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 17as follows:18Beginning at the southeast corner of said Lot 13; thence South 1988 degrees 08 minutes 36 seconds West along the south line of 20said Lot 13 a distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 10.00 feet west 21of and parallel with the east line of said Lot 13; thence North 2201 degrees 35 minutes 21 seconds West along said parallel line 23a distance of 20.00 feet, to a line 20.00 feet north of and 24parallel with said south line of Lot 13; thence North 88 25degrees 08 minutes 36 seconds East along said parallel line a   HB0250 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1distance of 10.00 feet, to said east line of Lot 13; thence 2South 01 degrees 35 minutes 21 seconds East along said east 3line a distance of 20.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.4Said parcel containing 0.005 acres, more or less or 200 square 5feet, more or less. 6Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)7Section: 08-00169-18-LA8County: Will9Job No.:10Parcel: 005211Station: 268+47.49 to 271+31.8212Index No.: 16-05-02-400-036-00001316-05-02-400-037-000014That part of Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter of 15Section 2, Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third 16Principal Meridian, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and 17distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 18East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 190.999956901, described as follows:20Beginning at the southwest corner of said Southwest Quarter of 21the Southeast Quarter; thence North 01 degrees 35 minutes 29 22seconds West along the west line of said Southwest Quarter of 23the Southeast Quarter a distance of 44.58 feet, to the north 24line of dedication for public road purposes per Document No. 25457943; thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East   HB0250 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1along said north line a distance of 28.00 feet, to the easterly 2line of dedication for public road purposes per Document No. 3R2008- 073540; thence North 29 degrees 04 minutes 52 seconds 4West along said easterly line a distance of 60.66 feet, to the 5north corner of said dedication for public road purposes per 6Document No. R2008-073540 said corner being on said west line 7of the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence 8North 01 degrees 35 minutes 29 seconds West along said west 9line a distance of 186.42 feet, to the north line of the south 10285.00 feet of said Southwest Quarter of the Southeast 11Quarter; thence North 88 degrees 08 minutes 10 seconds East 12along said north line a distance of 15.00 feet, to a line 15.00 13feet east of and parallel with said west line of the Southwest 14Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 35 15minutes 29 seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 16204.49 feet, to a line 5.00 feet easterly of and parallel with 17said easterly line of dedication for public road purposes per 18Document No. R2008-073540; thence South 29 degrees 04 minutes 1952 seconds East along said easterly line a distance of 34.71 20feet, to a line 5.00 feet north of and parallel with said north 21line of dedication for public road purposes per Document No. 22457943; thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East 23along said parallel line a distance of 252.98 feet, to a line 24284.00 feet east of and parallel with said west line of the 25Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence South 01 26degrees 35 minutes 29 seconds East along said parallel line a   HB0250 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1distance of 5.00 feet, to said north line of dedication for 2public road purposes per Document No. 457943; thence North 88 3degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East along said north line a 4distance of 528.12 feet, to the east line of the west 812.11 5feet of said Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; 6thence South 01 degrees 35 minutes 29 seconds East along said 7east line a distance of 46.24 feet, to the south line of said 8Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence South 88 9degrees 08 minutes 10 seconds West along said south line a 10distance of 812.12 feet, to the Point of Beginning.11Said parcel containing 0.949 acres, more or less or 41,318 12square feet, more or less, of which 0.847 acres, more or less 13or 36,880 square feet, more or less, was previously dedicated 14or used for highway purposes. 15Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)16Section: 08-00169-18-LA17County: Will18Job No.:19Parcel: 0052TE20Station: 271+12.12 to 271+72.1421Index No.: 16-05-02-400-036-00002216-05-02-400-037-000023That part of Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter of 24Section 2, Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third 25Principal Meridian, in Will County, Illinois, bearings and   HB0250 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, 2East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined factor of 30.999956901, described as follows:4Commencing at the southwest corner of said Southwest Quarter 5of the Southeast Quarter; thence North 01 degrees 35 minutes 629 seconds West along the west line of said Southwest Quarter 7of the Southeast Quarter a distance of 44.58 feet, to the north 8line of dedication for public road purposes per Document No. 9457943; thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East 10along said north line a distance of 28.00 feet, to the easterly 11line of dedication for public road purposes per Document No. 12R2008- 073540; thence North 29 degrees 04 minutes 52 seconds 13West along said easterly line a distance of 60.66 feet, to the 14north corner of said dedication for public road purposes per 15Document No. R2008-073540 said corner being on said west line 16of the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence 17North 01 degrees 35 minutes 29 seconds West along said west 18line a distance of 186.42 feet, to the north line of the south 19285.00 feet of said Southwest Quarter of the Southeast 20Quarter; thence North 88 degrees 08 minutes 10 seconds East 21along said north line a distance of 15.00 feet, to a line 15.00 22feet east of and parallel with said west line of the Southwest 23Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 35 24minutes 29 seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 25204.49 feet, to a line 5.00 feet easterly of and parallel with 26said easterly line of dedication for public road purposes per   HB0250 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Document No. R2008-073540; thence South 29 degrees 04 minutes 252 seconds East along said easterly line a distance of 34.71 3feet, to a line 5.00 feet north of and parallel with said north 4line of dedication for public road purposes per Document No. 5457943; thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East 6along said parallel line a distance of 233.28 feet, to the 7Point of Beginning; thence continuing North 88 degrees 01 8minutes 07 seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 919.70 feet, to a line 284.00 feet east of and parallel with 10said west line of the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast 11Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 35 minutes 29 seconds East 12along said parallel line a distance of 5.00 feet, to said north 13line of dedication for public road purposes per Document No. 14457943; thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East 15along said north line a distance of 40.30 feet, to a line 16324.30 feet east of and parallel with said west line of the 17Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence North 01 18degrees 35 minutes 29 seconds West along said parallel line a 19distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 10.00 feet north of and 20parallel with said north line of dedication for public road 21purposes per Document No. 457943; thence South 88 degrees 01 22minutes 07 seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 2360.00 feet, to a line 264.30 feet east of and parallel with 24said west line of the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast 25Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 35 minutes 29 seconds East 26along said parallel line a distance of 5.00 feet, to the Point   HB0250 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1of Beginning.2Said parcel containing 0.012 acres, more or less or 501 square 3feet, more or less. 4Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)5Section: 08-00169-18-LA6County: Will7Job No.:8Parcel: 0155PE9Station: 229+44.58 to 229+61.9710Index No.: 16-05-10-203-034-000011That part of Lot 5 in Block 1 in Pebble Creek Unit 2 Phase 1, 12being a subdivision of part of the Northeast Quarter of 13Section 10, Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third 14Principal Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded 15January 12, 1977, as Document Number R77-001234, in Will 16County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 17State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 18adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 19as follows:20Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 5; thence North 2188 degrees 01 minutes 17 seconds East along the north line of 22said Lot 5 a distance of 17.38 feet; thence South 01 degrees 58 23minutes 43 seconds East a distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 2410.00 feet south of and parallel with said north line of Lot 5; 25thence South 88 degrees 01 minutes 17 seconds West along said   HB0250 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1parallel line a distance of 11.57 feet, to the southwesterly 2line of said Lot 5; thence North 32 degrees 08 minutes 50 3seconds West along said southwesterly line a distance of 11.57 4feet, to the Point of Beginning.5Said parcel containing 0.003 acres, more or less or 145 square 6feet, more or less. 7Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)8Section: 08-00169-18-LA9County: Will10Job No.:11Parcel: 0156PE12Station: 230+90.03 to 231+10.0413Index No.: 16-05-10-203-035-000014That part of Lot 4 in Block 1 in Pebble Creek Unit 2 Phase 1, 15being a subdivision of part of the Northeast Quarter of 16Section 10, Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third 17Principal Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded 18January 12, 1977, as Document Number R77-001234, in Will 19County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 20State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 21adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 22as follows:23Commencing at the northwest corner of said Lot 4; thence North 2488 degrees 01 minutes 17 seconds East along the north line of 25said Lot 4 a distance of 29.70 feet, to the Point of Beginning;   HB0250 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1thence continuing North 88 degrees 01 minutes 17 seconds East 2along said north line a distance of 20.00 feet, to a line 15.30 3feet west of and parallel with the east line of said Lot 4; 4thence South 01 degrees 58 minutes 43 seconds East along said 5parallel line a distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 10.00 feet 6south of and parallel with said north line of Lot 4; thence 7South 88 degrees 01 minutes 17 seconds West along said 8parallel line a distance of 20.00 feet, to a line 35.30 feet 9west of and parallel with said east line of Lot 4; thence North 1001 degrees 58 minutes 43 seconds West along said parallel line 11a distance of 10.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.12Said parcel containing 0.005 acres, more or less or 200 square 13feet, more or less. 14Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)15Section: 08-00169-18-LA16County: Will17Job No.:18Parcel: 016519Station: 241+23.91 to 241+53.8620Index No.: 16-05-10-207-011-000021That part of Lot 169 in Block 7 in Pebble Creek Unit 2 Phase 2, 22being a subdivision of part of the Northeast Quarter of 23Section 10, Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third 24Principal Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded 25June 3, 1977, as Document Number R77-018514, in Will County,   HB0250 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois State 2Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), 3with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:4Beginning at the northeast corner of said Lot 169; thence 5South 01 degrees 49 minutes 37 seconds East along the east line 6of said Lot 169 a distance of 30.00 feet; thence North 46 7degrees 54 minutes 10 seconds West a distance of 42.37 feet, to 8the north line of said Lot 169; thence North 88 degrees 01 9minutes 17 seconds East along said north line a distance of 1030.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.11Said parcel containing 0.010 acres, more or less or 450 square 12feet, more or less. 13Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)14Section: 08-00169-18-LA15County: Will16Job No.:17Parcel: 019018Station: 596+50.29 to 597+20.3019Index No.: 16-05-10-200-012-000020That part of the Northeast Quarter of Section 10, Township 36 21North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in Will 22County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 23State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 24adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 25as follows:  HB0250 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Commencing at the Northeast corner of said Northeast Quarter; 2thence South 01 degrees 49 minutes 07 seconds East along the 3east line of said Northeast Quarter a distance of 290.00 feet, 4to a line perpendicular to said east line and the Point of 5Beginning; thence South 88 degrees 10 minutes 53 seconds West 6along said perpendicular line a distance of 50.00 feet, to a 7line 50.00 feet west of and parallel with said east line of the 8Northeast Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 49 minutes 07 9seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 70.00 10feet, to a line perpendicular to said east line of the 11Northeast Quarter; thence North 88 degrees 10 minutes 53 12seconds East along said perpendicular line a distance of 50.00 13feet, to said east line of the Northeast Quarter; thence North 1401 degrees 49 minutes 07 seconds West along said east line a 15distance of 70.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.1617Said parcel containing 0.080 acres, more or less or 3,500 18square feet, more or less. 19Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)20Section: 08-00169-18-LA21County: Will22Job No.:23Parcel: 019124Station: 594+99.25 to 596+50.2925Index No.: 16-05-10-200-013-0000  HB0250 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1That part of the Northeast Quarter of Section 10, Township 36 2North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, in Will 3County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 4State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 5adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 6as follows:7Commencing at the Northeast corner of said Northeast Quarter; 8thence South 01 degrees 49 minutes 07 seconds East along the 9east line of said Northeast Quarter a distance of 290.00 feet, 10to a line perpendicular to said east line; thence South 88 11degrees 10 minutes 53 seconds West along said perpendicular 12line a distance of 50.00 feet, to a line 50.00 feet west of and 13parallel with said east line of the Northeast Quarter; thence 14South 01 degrees 49 minutes 07 seconds East along said 15parallel line a distance of 70.00 feet, to a line 16perpendicular to said east line of the Northeast Quarter and 17the Point of Beginning; thence North 88 degrees 10 minutes 53 18seconds East along said perpendicular line a distance of 50.00 19feet, to said east line of the Northeast Quarter; thence South 2001 degrees 49 minutes 07 seconds East along said east line a 21distance of 150.00 feet, to a line perpendicular to said east 22line; thence South 88 degrees 10 minutes 53 seconds West along 23said perpendicular line a distance of 50.00 feet, to a line 2450.00 feet west of and parallel with said east line of the 25Northeast Quarter; thence North 01 degrees 49 minutes 07 26seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 150.00   HB0250 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1feet, to the Point of Beginning.2Said parcel containing 0.172 acres, more or less or 7,500 3square feet, more or less. 4Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)5Section: 08-00169-18-LA6County: Will7Job No.:8Parcel: 0166TE-A9Station: 242+93.89 to 247+30.7310Index No.: 16-05-11-101-029-000011That part of Outlot A in Dawnwood Unit No. 1, a subdivision in 12a Planned Unit Development of part of the West Half of the 13Northwest Quarter of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, 14Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal 15Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded August 20, 161991, as Document Number R91-047260, in Will County, Illinois, 17bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 18Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a 19combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:20Beginning at the north most northwest corner of said Outlot A; 21thence North 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along the 22north line of said Outlot A for a distance of 426.79 feet, to a 23line 134.00 feet west of and parallel with the east line of 24said Outlot A; thence South 01 degrees 46 minutes 03 seconds 25East along said parallel line a distance of 40.00 feet, to a   HB0250 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1line 40.00 feet south of and parallel with said north line of 2Outlot A; thence South 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West 3along said parallel line a distance of 34.00 feet; thence 4North 01 degrees 55 minutes 46 seconds West a distance of 2.00 5feet, to a line 38.00 feet south of and parallel with said 6north line of Outlot A; thence South 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 7seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 12.00 8feet; thence South 01 degrees 55 minutes 46 seconds East a 9distance of 2.00 feet, to said line 40.00 feet south of and 10parallel with the north line of Outlot A; thence South 88 11degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West along said parallel line a 12distance of 39.00 feet, to a line 219.00 feet west of and 13parallel with said east line of Outlot A; thence North 01 14degrees 46 minutes 03 seconds West along said parallel line a 15distance of 30.00 feet, to a line 10.00 feet south of and 16parallel with said north line of Outlot A; thence South 88 17degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West along said parallel line a 18distance of 351.79 feet, to the northwesterly line of said 19Outlot A; thence North 43 degrees 09 minutes 04 seconds East 20along said northwesterly line a distance of 14.16 feet, to the 21Point of Beginning.2223Said parcel containing 0.157 acres, more or less or 6,844 24square feet, more or less. 25Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)  HB0250 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Section: 08-00169-18-LA2County: Will3Job No.:4Parcel: 0166TE-B5Station: 248+39.67 to 248+64.676Index No.: 16-05-11-101-029-00007That part of Outlot A in Dawnwood Unit No. 1, a subdivision in 8a Planned Unit Development of part of the West Half of the 9Northwest Quarter of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, 10Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal 11Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded August 20, 121991, as Document Number R91-047260, in Will County, Illinois, 13bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 14Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a 15combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:16Beginning at the northeast corner of said Outlot A; thence 17South 01 degrees1846 minutes 03 seconds East along the east line of said Outlot A 19for a distance of 15.00 feet, to a line 15.00 feet south of and 20parallel with the north line of said Outlot A; thence South 88 21degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West along said parallel line a 22distance of 25.00 feet, to a line 25.00 feet west of and 23parallel with said east line of Outlot A; thence North 01 24degrees 46 minutes 03 seconds West along said parallel line a 25distance of 15.00 feet, to said north line of Outlot A; thence 26North 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along said north   HB0250 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1line a distance of 25.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.2Said parcel containing 0.009 acres, more or less or 375 square 3feet, more or less. 4Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)5Section: 08-00169-18-LA6County: Will7Job No.:8Parcel: 01679Station: 248+64.69 to 250+36.7310Index No.: 16-05-11-101-001-000011That part of Lot 1 in Old Oak, a subdivision of part of the 12Northwest Quarter of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, 13Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal 14Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded August 22, 151968, as Document Number R68-014102, in Will County, Illinois, 16bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 17Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a 18combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:19Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 1; thence North 2088 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along the north line of 21said Lot 1 a distance of 172.00 feet, to the east line of said 22Lot 1; thence South 01 degrees 55 minutes 46 seconds East along 23said east line a distance of 30.00 feet; thence North 46 24degrees 55 minutes 46 seconds West a distance of 28.28 feet, to 25a line 10.00 feet south of and parallel with said north line of   HB0250 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Lot 1; thence South 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West along 2said parallel line a distance of 152.03 feet, to the west line 3of said Lot 1; thence North 01 degrees 46 minutes 03 seconds 4West along said west line a distance of 10.00 feet, to the 5Point of Beginning.6Said parcel containing 0.044 acres, more or less or 1,921 7square feet, more or less. 8Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)9Section: 08-00169-18-LA10County: Will11Job No.:12Parcel: 016813Station: 251+02.71 to 252+57.9614Index No.: 16-05-11-102-001-000015That part of Lot 2 in Old Oak, a subdivision of part of the 16Northwest Quarter of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, 17Township 36 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal 18Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded August 22, 191968, as Document Number R68-014102, in Will County, Illinois, 20bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 21Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a 22combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:23Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 2; thence North 2488 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along the north line of 25said Lot 2 a distance of 155.23 feet, to the east line of said   HB0250 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Lot 2; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 46 seconds East along 2said east line a distance of 5.00 feet, to a line 5.00 feet 3south of and parallel with said north line of Lot 2; thence 4South 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West along said 5parallel line a distance of 140.22 feet; thence South 43 6degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West a distance of 21.21 feet, to 7the west line of said Lot 2; thence North 01 degrees 55 minutes 846 seconds West along said west line a distance of 20.00 feet, 9to the Point of Beginning.10Said parcel containing 0.020 acres, more or less or 889 square 11feet, more or less. 12Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)13Section: 08-00169-18-LA14County: Will15Job No.:16Parcel: 016917Station: 252+57.88 to 255+37.9618Index No.: 16-05-11-102-013-000019That part of Lot 24 in Old Oak Unit No. 2, being a subdivision 20of part of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, Township 36 21North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 22according to the plat thereof recorded October 14, 1969, as 23Document Number R69-019112, in Will County, Illinois, bearings 24and distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate 25System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined   HB0250 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:2Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 24; thence North 388 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along the north line of 4said Lot 24 a distance of 280.00 feet, to the east line of the 5west 280.00 feet of said Lot 24; thence South 01 degrees 44 6minutes 01 seconds East along said east line a distance of 715.00 feet, to a line 15.00 feet south of and parallel with 8said north line of Lot 24; thence South 88 degrees 04 minutes 914 seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 125.50 10feet, to a line 154.50 feet east of and parallel with the west 11line of said Lot 24; thence South 01 degrees 44 minutes 01 12seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 10.00 13feet, to a line 25.00 feet south of and parallel with said 14north line of Lot 24; thence South 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 15seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 154.50 16feet, to said west line of Lot 24; thence North 01 degrees 44 17minutes 01 seconds West along said west line a distance of 1825.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.19Said parcel containing 0.132 acres, more or less or 5,745 20square feet, more or less. 21Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)22Section: 08-00169-18-LA23County: Will24Job No.:25Parcel: 0169TE  HB0250 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Station: 253+31.81 to 254+38.912Index No.: 16-05-11-102-013-00003That part of Lot 24 in Old Oak Unit No. 2, being a subdivision 4of part of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, Township 36 5North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 6according to the plat thereof recorded October 14, 1969, as 7Document Number R69-019112, in Will County, Illinois, bearings 8and distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate 9System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined 10factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:11Commencing at the northwest corner of said Lot 24; thence 12North 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along the north 13line of said Lot 24 a distance of 280.00 feet, to the east line 14of the west 280.00 feet of said Lot 24; thence South 01 degrees 1544 minutes 01 seconds East along said east line a distance of 1615.00 feet, to a line 15.00 feet south of and parallel with 17said north line of Lot 24; thence South 88 degrees 04 minutes 1814 seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 99.00 19feet, to the Point of Beginning; thence continuing South 88 20degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West along said parallel line a 21distance of 26.50 feet, to a line 154.50 feet east of and 22parallel with the west line of said Lot 24; thence South 01 23degrees 44 minutes 01 seconds East along said parallel line a 24distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 25.00 feet south of and 25parallel with said north line of Lot 24; thence South 88 26degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West along said parallel line a   HB0250 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1distance of 80.50 feet, to a line 74.00 feet east of and 2parallel with said west line of Lot 24; thence South 01 degrees 344 minutes 01 seconds East along said parallel line a distance 4of 25.00 feet, to a line 50.00 feet south of and parallel with 5said north line of Lot 24; thence North 88 degrees 04 minutes 614 seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 107.00 7feet, to a line 181.00 feet east of and parallel with said west 8line of Lot 24; thence North 01 degrees 44 minutes 01 seconds 9West along said parallel line a distance of 35.00 feet, to the 10Point of Beginning.11Said parcel containing 0.067 acres, more or less or 2,940 12square feet, more or less. 13Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)14Section: 08-00169-18-LA15County: Will16Job No.:17Parcel: 017018Station: 255+37.89 to 257+86.5819Index No.: 16-05-11-102-014-000020That part of Lot 24 in Old Oak Unit No. 2, being a subdivision 21of part of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, Township 36 22North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 23according to the plat thereof recorded October 14, 1969 as 24Document Number R69-019112, in Will County, Illinois, bearings 25and distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate   HB0250 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined 2factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:3Beginning at the intersection of the north line of said Lot 24 4with the east line of the west 280.00 feet of said Lot 24; 5thence North 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along said 6north line of Lot 24 a distance of 248.62 feet, to the east 7line of said Lot 24; thence South 01 degrees 44 minutes 01 8seconds East along said east line a distance of 45.00 feet; 9thence North 46 degrees 49 minutes 54 seconds West a distance 10of 42.35 feet, to a line 15.00 feet south of and parallel with 11said north line of Lot 24; thence South 88 degrees 04 minutes 1214 seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 218.62 13feet, to said east line of the west 280.00 feet of said Lot 24; 14thence North 01 degrees 44 minutes 01 seconds West along said 15east line a distance of 15.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.16Said parcel containing 0.096 acres, more or less or 4,180 17square feet, more or less. 18Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)19Section: 08-00169-18-LA20County: Will21Job No.:22Parcel: 017123Station: 258+53.70 to 262+01.0324Index No.: 16-05-11-103-001-000025That part of Lot 9 in Old Oak Subdivision Unit 4A of part of   HB0250 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1the East Half of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, Township 236 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 3according to the plat thereof recorded May 2, 1979, as 4Document Number R79-017119, in Will County, Illinois, bearings 5and distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate 6System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined 7factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:8Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 9; thence North 988 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along the north line of 10said Lot 9 a distance of 347.21 feet, to the east line of said 11Lot 9; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 38 seconds East along 12said east line a distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 10.00 feet 13south of and parallel with said north line of Lot 9; thence 14South 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West along said 15parallel line a distance of 313.46 feet; thence South 43 16degrees 10 minutes 06 seconds West a distance of 47.73 feet, to 17the west line of said Lot 9; thence North 01 degrees 49 minutes 1835 seconds West along said west line a distance of 43.69 feet, 19to the Point of Beginning.20Said parcel containing 0.093 acres, more or less or 4,041 21square feet, more or less. 22Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)23Section: 08-00169-18-LA24County: Will25Job No.:  HB0250 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Parcel: 0171TE2Station: 258+82.52 to 259+99.943Index No.: 16-05-11-103-001-00004That part of Lot 9 in Old Oak Subdivision Unit 4A of part of 5the East Half of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, Township 636 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 7according to the plat thereof recorded May 2, 1979, as 8Document Number R79-017119, in Will County, Illinois, bearings 9and distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate 10System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined 11factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:12Commencing at the northwest corner of said Lot 9; thence North 1388 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along the north line of 14said Lot 9 a distance of 347.21 feet, to the east line of said 15Lot 9; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 38 seconds East along 16said east line a distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 10.00 feet 17south of and parallel with said north line of Lot 9; thence 18South 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds West along said 19parallel line a distance of 201.05 feet, to the Point of 20Beginning; thence continuing South 88 degrees 04 minutes 14 21seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 112.41 22feet; thence South 43 degrees 10 minutes 06 seconds West a 23distance of 7.08 feet, to a line 15.00 feet south of and 24parallel with said north line of Lot 9; thence North 88 degrees 2504 minutes 14 seconds East along said parallel line a distance 26of 117.42 feet; thence North 01 degrees 55 minutes 46 seconds   HB0250 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1West a distance of 5.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.2Said parcel containing 0.013 acres, more or less or 574 square 3feet, more or less. 4Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)5Section: 08-00169-18-LA6County: Will7Job No.:8Parcel: 01729Station: 262+01.00 to 262+91.0310Index No.: 16-05-11-103-002-000011That part of Lot 8 in Old Oak Subdivision Unit 4A of part of 12the East Half of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, Township 1336 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 14according to the plat thereof recorded May 2, 1979, as 15Document Number R79-017119, in Will County, Illinois, bearings 16and distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate 17System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined 18factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:19Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 8; thence North 2088 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along said north line a 21distance of 90.00 feet, to the east line of said Lot 8; thence 22South 01 degrees 48 minutes 38 seconds East along said east 23line a distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 10.00 feet south of 24and parallel with said north line; thence South 88 degrees 04 25minutes 14 seconds West along said parallel line a distance of   HB0250 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b190.00 feet, to the west line of said Lot 8; thence North 01 2degrees 48 minutes 38 seconds West along said west line a 3distance of 10.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.4Said parcel containing 0.021 acres, more or less or 900 square 5feet, more or less. 6Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)7Section: 08-00169-18-LA8County: Will9Job No.:10Parcel: 0173TE11Station: 262+91.00 to 263+81.0312Index No.: 16-05-11-103-003-000013That part of Lot 7 in Old Oak Subdivision Unit 4A of part of 14the East Half of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, Township 1536 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 16according to the plat thereof recorded May 2, 1979, as 17Document Number R79-017119, in Will County, Illinois, bearings 18and distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate 19System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined 20factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:21Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 7; thence North 2288 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along said north line a 23distance of 90.00 feet, to the east line of said Lot 7; thence 24South 01 degrees 48 minutes 38 seconds East along said east 25line a distance of 10.00 feet, to a line 10.00 feet south of   HB0250 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1and parallel with said north line; thence South 88 degrees 04 2minutes 14 seconds West along said parallel line a distance of 390.00 feet, to the west line of said Lot 7; thence North 01 4degrees 48 minutes 38 seconds West along said west line a 5distance of 10.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.6Said parcel containing 0.021 acres, more or less or 900 square 7feet, more or less. 8Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)9Section: 08-00169-18-LA10County: Will11Job No.:12Parcel: 0175TE13Station: 264+71.00 to 267+00.0314Index No.: 16-05-11-103-058-00001516-05-11-103-059-000016That part of Lot 3 in Old Oak Subdivision Unit 4A of part of 17the East Half of the Northwest Quarter of Section 11, Township 1836 North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian, 19according to the plat thereof recorded May 2, 1979, as 20Document Number R79-017119, in Will County, Illinois, bearings 21and distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate 22System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a combined 23factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:24Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 3; thence North 2588 degrees 04 minutes 14 seconds East along said north line a   HB0250 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1distance of 229.00 feet; thence South 01 degrees 55 minutes 46 2seconds East a distance of 3.00 feet, to a line 3.00 feet south 3of and parallel with said north line; thence South 88 degrees 404 minutes 14 seconds West along said parallel line a distance 5of 169.00 feet; thence South 01 degrees 55 minutes 46 seconds 6East a distance of 7.00 feet, to a line 10.00 feet south of and 7parallel with said north line of Lot 3; thence South 88 degrees 804 minutes 14 seconds West along said parallel line a distance 9of 60.02 feet, to the west line of said Lot 3; thence North 01 10degrees 48 minutes 38 seconds West along said west line a 11distance of 10.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.12Said parcel containing 0.025 acres, more or less or 1,107 13square feet, more or less. 14Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)15Section: 08-00169-18-LA16County: Will17Job No.:18Parcel: 017719Station: 268+47.51 to 269+97.5320Index No.: 16-05-11-200-027-000021That part of the North 324.18 feet of the West 150 feet of the 22Northeast Quarter of Section 11, Township 36 North, Range 11 23East of the Third Principal Meridian in Will County, Illinois, 24bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 25Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a   HB0250 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:2Beginning at the northwest corner of said Northeast Quarter; 3thence North 88 degrees 08 minutes 10 seconds East along the 4north line of said Northeast Quarter a distance of 150.00 5feet, to the east line of said West 150 feet of the Northeast 6Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds East 7along said east line a distance of 55.11 feet, to the south 8line of 143rd Street per Dedication Of Right Of Way For Public 9Road Purposes per Document Number 457942; thence South 88 10degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds West along said south line a 11distance of 125.00 feet, to the northeast corner of Dedication 12Of Right Of Way For Public Road Purposes per Document Number 13R2007-115636; thence South 43 degrees 06 minutes 26 seconds 14West along the southeasterly line of said dedication a 15distance of 35.41 feet, to the west line of said Northeast 16Quarter; thence North 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds West 17along said west line a distance of 80.42 feet, to the Point of 18Beginning.19Said parcel containing 0.197 acres, more or less or 8,602 20square feet, more or less, of which 0.197 acres, more or less 21or 8,602 square feet, more or less, was previously dedicated 22or used for highway purposes. 23Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)24Section: 08-00169-18-LA25County: Will  HB0250 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Job No.:2Parcel: 0177TE-A3Station: 269+76.52 to 269+97.534Index No.: 16-05-11-200-027-00005That part of the North 324.18 feet of the West 150 feet of the 6Northeast Quarter of Section 11, Township 36 North, Range 11 7East of the Third Principal Meridian in Will County, Illinois, 8bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 9Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a 10combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:11Commencing at the northwest corner of said Northeast Quarter; 12thence North 88 degrees 08 minutes 10 seconds East along the 13north line of said Northeast Quarter a distance of 150.00 14feet, to the east line of said West 150 feet of the Northeast 15Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds East 16along said east line a distance of 55.11 feet, to the south 17line of 143rd Street per Dedication Of Right Of Way For Public 18Road Purposes per Document Number 457942 and the Point of 19Beginning; thence South 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds West 20along said south line a distance of 21.00 feet; thence South 01 21degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds East a distance of 10.00 feet; 22thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East a distance 23of 21.00 feet, to said east line of the West 150 feet of the 24Northeast Quarter; thence North 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 25seconds West along said east line a distance of 10.00 feet, to 26the Point of Beginning.  HB0250 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Said parcel containing 0.005 acres, more or less or 210 square 2feet, more or less. 3Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)4Section: 08-00169-18-LA5County: Will6Job No.:7Parcel: 0177TE-B8Station: 268+47.51 to 268+92.539Index No.: 16-05-11-200-027-000010That part of the North 324.18 feet of the West 150 feet of the 11Northeast Quarter of Section 11, Township 36 North, Range 11 12East of the Third Principal Meridian in Will County, Illinois, 13bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 14Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 adjustment), with a 15combined factor of 0.999956901, described as follows:16Commencing at the northwest corner of said Northeast Quarter; 17thence North 88 degrees 08 minutes 10 seconds East along the 18north line of said Northeast Quarter a distance of 150.00 19feet, to the east line of said West 150 feet of the Northeast 20Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds East 21along said east line a distance of 55.11 feet, to the south 22line of 143rd Street per Dedication Of Right Of Way For Public 23Road Purposes per Document Number 457942; thence South 88 24degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds West along said south line a 25distance of 105.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning; thence   HB0250 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1continuing South 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds West along 2said south line a distance of 20.00 feet, to the northeast 3corner of Dedication Of Right Of Way For Public Road Purposes 4per Document Number R2007-115636; thence South 43 degrees 06 5minutes 26 seconds West along the southeasterly line of said 6dedication a distance of 35.41 feet, to the west line of said 7Northeast Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 8seconds East along said west line a distance of 153.85 feet; 9thence North 88 degrees 11 minutes 22 seconds East a distance 10of 20.00 feet; thence North 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds 11West a distance of 44.00 feet; thence South 88 degrees 11 12minutes 22 seconds West a distance of 15.00 feet; thence North 1301 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds West a distance of 78.61 feet; 14thence North 88 degrees 11 minutes 22 seconds East a distance 15of 15.00 feet; thence North 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds 16West a distance of 20.14 feet, to a line 22.00 feet 17southeasterly of and parallel with said southeasterly line of 18Dedication Of Right Of Way For Public Road Purposes per 19Document Number R2007-115636; thence North 43 degrees 06 20minutes 26 seconds East along said parallel line a distance of 2135.41 feet; thence North 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds West 22a distance of 11.16 feet, to the Point of Beginning.23Said parcel containing 0.061 acres, more or less or 2,677 24square feet, more or less. 25Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)  HB0250 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1Section: 08-00169-18-LA2County: Will3Job No.:4Parcel: 01785Station: 269+97.53 to 275+08.486Index No.: 16-05-11-200-028-0000716-05-11-200-029-0000816-05-11-200-030-0000916-05-11-200-032-000010That part of the Northeast Quarter of Section 11, Township 36 11North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian in Will 12County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 13State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 14adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 15as follows:16Beginning at the intersection of the north line of said 17Northeast Quarter with the east line of the West 150.00 feet of 18said Northeast Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 19seconds East along said east line a distance of 55.11 feet, to 20the south line of 143rd Street per Dedication Of Right Of Way 21For Public Road Purposes per Document Number 457942; thence 22North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds East along said south 23line and along the south line of 143rd Street per Dedication Of 24Right Of Way For Public Road Purposes per Document Number 25457943 a distance of 510.99 feet, to the east line of the West 26Half of the West Half of said Northeast Quarter; thence North   HB0250 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b101 degrees 47 minutes 45 seconds West along said east line a 2distance of 54.07 feet, to said north line of the Northeast 3Quarter; thence South 88 degrees 08 minutes 10 seconds West 4along said north line a distance of 510.99 feet, to the Point 5of Beginning.6Said parcel containing 0.640 acres, more or less or 27,897 7square feet, more or less, of which 0.640 acres, more or less 8or 27,897 square feet, more or less, was previously dedicated 9or used for highway purposes. 10Route: County Highway #37 (143rd Street)11Section: 08-00169-18-LA12County: Will13Job No.:14Parcel: 0178TE15Station: 269+97.53 to 271+92.5316Index No.: 16-05-11-200-029-00001716-05-11-200-030-000018That part of the Northeast Quarter of Section 11, Township 36 19North, Range 11 East of the Third Principal Meridian in Will 20County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 21State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD83 (2011 22adjustment), with a combined factor of 0.999956901, described 23as follows:24Commencing at the intersection of the north line of said 25Northeast Quarter with the east line of the West 150.00 feet of   HB0250 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 04088 JRC 14112 b1said Northeast Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 2seconds East along said east line a distance of 55.11 feet, to 3the south line of 143rd Street per Dedication Of Right Of Way 4For Public Road Purposes per Document Number 457942 and the 5Point of Beginning; thence North 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 6seconds East along said south line and along the south line of 7143rd Street per Dedication Of Right Of Way For Public Road 8Purposes per Document Number 457943 a distance of 195.00 feet, 9to the east line of the West 345.00 feet of said Northeast 10Quarter; thence South 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds East 11along said east line a distance of 38.00 feet; thence South 88 12degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds West a distance of 164.00 feet; 13thence North 01 degrees 48 minutes 15 seconds West a distance 14of 28.00 feet; thence South 88 degrees 01 minutes 07 seconds 15West a distance of 31.00 feet, to said east line of the West 16150.00 feet of the Northeast Quarter; thence North 01 degrees 1748 minutes 15 seconds West along said east line a distance of 1810.00 feet, to the Point of Beginning.19Said parcel containing 0.150 acres, more or less or 6,542 20square feet, more or less.21    (b) This Section is repealed 3 years after the effective 22date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.